Utah statutes.
78B-2-105.   Effect of death.
(1)  If a person entitled to bring an action dies before the expiration of the
statute of limitations and the cause of action survives, an action may be
brought by his representatives after the expiration of the time and within one
year from his death.
(2)  If a person against whom an action may be brought dies before the
expiration of the statute of limitations and the cause of action survives, an
action may be commenced against the representatives after the expiration of
the time and within one year after the issue of letters testamentary or of
administration.
